Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.720

Employee assistance program—Director of enterprise services—Duties.

The director of enterprise services shall:

(1) Administer the state employee assistance program to assist employees who have personal problems that adversely affect their job performance or have the potential of doing so;

(2) Develop policies, procedures, and activities for the program;

(3) Encourage and promote the voluntary use of the employee assistance program by increasing employee awareness and disseminating educational materials;

(4) Provide technical assistance and training to agencies on how to use the employee assistance program;

(5) Assist and encourage supervisors to identify and refer employees with problems that impair their performance by incorporating proper use of the program in management training, management performance criteria, ongoing communication with agencies, and other appropriate means;

(6) Offer substance abuse prevention and awareness activities to be provided through the employee assistance program and the state employee wellness program;

(7) Monitor and evaluate the effectiveness of the program, including the collection, analysis, and publication of relevant statistical information; and

(8) Consult with state agencies, institutions of higher education, and employee organizations in carrying out the purposes of RCW 41.04.700 through 41.04.730.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 439; 1990 c 60 s 303.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—Subheadings not law—1990 c 60: See notes following RCW 41.06.070.